Maryland, session 2026, HB0341.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 24. MARYLAND COMMISSION FOR BOYS’ AND MEN’S HEALTH.
13–2401.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “COMMISSION” MEANS THE MARYLAND COMMISSION FOR
BOYS’ AND MEN’S HEALTH.
13–2402.
THERE IS A MARYLAND COMMISSION FOR BOYS’ AND MEN’S HEALTH IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
13–2403.
(A) THE COMMISSION CONSISTS OF 18 MEMBERS.
(B) (1) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION SHALL BE
APPOINTED FROM AMONG APPLICANTS WHO HAVE BEEN NOMINATED AND
RECOMMENDED FOR APPOINTMENT BY ORGANIZATIONS LOCATED IN THE STATE
WHOSE INTERESTS RELATE TO BOYS’ AND MEN’S HEALTH OR FAMILY INVOLVEMENT:
(I) THREE MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR;
(II) THREE MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE
SENATE; AND
(III) THREE MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE
HOUSE.
(2) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION SHALL BE
APPOINTED FROM APPLICANTS APPLYING ON THEIR OWN BEHALF:
(I) THREE MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR;
(II) THREE MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE
SENATE; AND
(III) THREE MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE
HOUSE.

HOUSE BILL 341 3
(C) (1) A MEMBER SERVES AT THE PLEASURE OF THE APPOINTING
AUTHORITY.
(2) THE TERM OF A MEMBER IS 4 YEARS.
(3) AT THE END OF A TERM, THE MEMBER CONTINUES TO SERVE
UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND QUALIFIES.
(4) A MEMBER WHO IS APPOINTED AFTER A TERM HAS BEGUN SERVES
ONLY FOR THE REST OF THE TERM AND UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND
QUALIFIES.
(5) THE APPOINTING AUTHORITY MAY AUTHORIZE A MEMBER TO
SERVE A SECOND CONSECUTIVE TERM WITHOUT GOING THROUGH THE FORMAL
APPOINTMENT PROCESS.
(6) A MEMBER MAY NOT SERVE MORE THAN TWO CONSECUTIVE
TERMS.
(D) A MEMBER:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
COMMISSION; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(E) THE COMMISSION SHALL MEET AT LEAST 10 TIMES EACH YEAR.
(F) A MEMBER WHO FAILS TO ATTEND AT LEAST 50% OF THE REGULARLY
SCHEDULED MEETINGS DURING A 12–MONTH PERIOD SHALL BE CONSIDERED TO
HAVE RESIGNED.
(G) THE COMMISSION SHALL MAKE EACH VACANCY ON THE COMMISSION
KNOWN TO THE PUBLIC.
13–2404.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL ELECT A CHAIR AND A VICE CHAIR FROM
AMONG ITS MEMBERS.

HOUSE BILL 341
(B) THE COMMISSION MAY APPOINT ANY OFFICERS THAT IT CONSIDERS
NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT ITS DUTIES.
13–2405.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) PERIODICALLY REVIEW HEALTH DATA TO INFORM STRATEGIES
AIMED AT REDUCING NEGATIVE HEALTH OUTCOMES OF BOYS AND MEN FOR
SPECIFIC HEALTH CONDITIONS, INCLUDING PROSTATE AND TESTICULAR CANCER,
ORAL CANCER, CARDIOVASCULAR DISEASE, DEPRESSION, DIABETES, AND
SUBSTANCE USE DISORDERS;
(2) COLLABORATE WITH PARTNERS TO SHAPE AND ADVISE ON
POLICIES AND PROGRAMS, INCLUDING COMMUNITY OUTREACH AND
PUBLIC–PRIVATE PARTNERSHIPS, DESIGNED TO:
(I) RAISE PUBLIC AWARENESS OF BOYS’ AND MEN’S HEALTH
ISSUES, INCLUDING HEALTH PROBLEMS THAT DISPROPORTIONATELY AFFECT BOYS
AND MEN AND THE IMPORTANCE OF PATERNAL INVOLVEMENT IN THE FAMILY;
(II) SUPPORT BOYS’ AND MEN’S PARTICIPATION IN
HEALTH–PROMOTING ACTIVITIES FOR THEMSELVES AND THEIR FAMILIES,
INCLUDING REGULAR PHYSICIAN CHECKUPS, EARLY DETECTION AND PREVENTIVE
HEALTH SCREENINGS, AND HEALTHY LIFESTYLE PRACTICES; AND
(III) IDENTIFY AND PROMOTE STRATEGIES TO REDUCE OR
ELIMINATE HEALTH DISPARITIES RELATED TO MORBIDITY AND MORTALITY AMONG
BOYS AND MEN;
(3) PROMOTE GENDER AND CULTURALLY RESPONSIVE CARE ACROSS
THE HEALTH CARE SYSTEM IN THE STATE; AND
(4) MONITOR FEDERAL AND STATE POLICY AND LEGISLATION THAT
MAY AFFECT THE AREAS OF BOYS’ AND MEN’S HEALTH AND FAMILY INVOLVEMENT.
(B) THE COMMISSION SHALL CONSIDER POPULATION DIVERSITY WHEN
CARRYING OUT THE DUTIES ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION.
13–2406.

HOUSE BILL 341 5
(A) THE COMMISSION, SUBJECT TO THE APPROVAL OF THE SECRETARY,
MAY ACCEPT:
(1) FEDERAL FUNDS FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) PRIVATE GIFTS AND DONATIONS FROM INDIVIDUALS, PRIVATE
ORGANIZATIONS, OR FOUNDATIONS.
(B) THE ACCEPTANCE AND USE OF FEDERAL FUNDS MAY NOT BE
CONSIDERED A COMMITMENT OF STATE FUNDS AND PLACES NO OBLIGATION ON
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO CONTINUE THE PURPOSE FOR WHICH THE FUNDS ARE
AVAILABLE.
13–2407.
EACH UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT SHALL FULLY COOPERATE WITH THE
COMMISSION IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THE COMMISSION’S DUTIES.
13–2408.
(A) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 30 EACH YEAR, THE COMMISSION SHALL
SUBMIT RECOMMENDATIONS FOR POLICY CHANGES THAT WILL FURTHER THE
GOALS OF THE COMMISSION TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE SENATE FINANCE COMMITTEE
AND THE HOUSE HEALTH COMMITTEE.
(B) THE REPORT SUBMITTED IN 2028 AND EVERY 2 YEARS THEREAFTER
SHALL INCLUDE PROGRESS INDICATORS AND DATA TRENDS BASED ON THE
COMMISSION’S ACTIVITIES.
13–2409.
THE COMMISSION MAY NOT ADOPT REGULATIONS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, in making appointments
under this Act, the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House
shall ensure to the extent practicable geographic, demographic, and professional diversity
among the membership of the Maryland Commission for Boys’ and Men’s Health.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.